my_app/dictionaries/hunspell-la/la_LA.aff
SFX B o       undi            io        
SFX B o       vndi            io        
SFX B o       undique         io        
SFX B o       vndiqve         io        
SFX B o       undine          io        
SFX B o       vndine          io        
SFX B o       undive          io        
SFX B o       undiue          io          
SFX B o       vndive          io        
SFX B o       undo            io        
SFX B o       vndo            io        
SFX B o       undoque         io        
SFX B o       vndoqve         io        
SFX B o       undone          io        
SFX B o       vndone          io        
SFX B o       undove          io        
SFX B o       undoue          io          
SFX B o       vndove          io        
SFX B o       ens             io        
SFX B o       ensque          io        
SFX B o       ensqve          io        
SFX B o       ensne           io        
SFX B o       ensve           io        
SFX B o       ensue           io          
SFX B o       entem           io        
SFX B o       entemque        io        
SFX B o       entemqve        io        
SFX B o       entemne         io        
SFX B o       entemve         io        
SFX B o       entemue         io          
SFX B o       entis           io        
SFX B o       entisque        io        
SFX B o       entisqve        io        
SFX B o       entisne         io        
SFX B o       entisve         io        
SFX B o       entisue         io          
SFX B o       enti            io        
SFX B o       entique         io        
SFX B o       entiqve         io        
SFX B o       entine          io        
SFX B o       entive          io        
SFX B o       entiue          io          
SFX B o       ente            io        
SFX B o       enteque         io        
SFX B o       enteqve         io        
SFX B o       entene          io        
SFX B o       enteve          io        
SFX B o       enteue          io          
SFX B o       entes           io        
SFX B o       entesque        io        
SFX B o       entesqve        io        
SFX B o       entesne         io        
SFX B o       entesve         io        
SFX B o       entesue         io          
SFX B o       entium          io        
SFX B o       entivm          io        
SFX B o       entiumque       io        
SFX B o       entivmqve       io        
SFX B o       entiumne        io        
SFX B o       entivmne        io        
SFX B o       entiumve        io        
SFX B o       entiumue        io          
SFX B o       entivmve        io        
SFX B o       entum          io        
SFX B o       entvm          io        
SFX B o       entumque       io        
SFX B o       entvmqve       io        
SFX B o       entumne        io        
SFX B o       entvmne        io        
SFX B o       entumve        io        
SFX B o       entumue        io          
SFX B o       entvmve        io        
SFX B o       entibus         io        
SFX B o       entibvs         io        
SFX B o       entibusque      io        
SFX B o       entibvsqve      io        
SFX B o       entibusne       io        
SFX B o       entibvsne       io        
SFX B o       entibusve       io        
SFX B o       entibusue       io          
SFX B o       entibvsve       io        
SFX B o       entia           io        
SFX B o       entiaque        io        
SFX B o       entiaqve        io        
SFX B o       entiane         io        
SFX B o       entiave         io        
SFX B o       entiaue         io         
SFX B o       or              io        
SFX B o       orque           io        
SFX B o       orqve           io        
SFX B o       orne            io        
SFX B o       orve            io        
SFX B o       orue            io          
SFX B io      eris            io        
SFX B io      erisque         io        
SFX B io      erisqve         io        
SFX B io      erisne          io        
SFX B io      erisve          io        
SFX B io      erisue          io          
SFX B io      itur            io        
SFX B io      itvr            io        
SFX B io      iturque         io        
SFX B io      itvrqve         io        
SFX B io      iturne          io        
SFX B io      itvrne          io        
SFX B io      iturve          io        
SFX B io      iturue          io          
SFX B io      itvrve          io        
SFX B io      imur            io        
SFX B io      imvr            io        
SFX B io      imurque         io        
SFX B io      imvrqve         io        
SFX B io      imurne          io        
SFX B io      imvrne          io        
SFX B io      imurve          io        
SFX B io      imurue          io          
SFX B io      imvrve          io        
SFX B io      imini           io        
SFX B io      iminique        io        
SFX B io      iminiqve        io        
SFX B io      iminine         io        
SFX B io      iminive         io        
SFX B io      iminiue         io          
SFX B io      iuntur          io        
SFX B io      ivntvr          io        
SFX B io      iunturque       io        
SFX B io      ivntvrqve       io        
SFX B io      iunturne        io        
SFX B io      ivntvrne        io        
SFX B io      iunturve        io        
SFX B io      iunturue        io          
SFX B io      ivntvrve        io        
SFX B o       ebar            io        
SFX B o       ebarque         io        
SFX B o       ebarqve         io        
SFX B o       ebarne          io        
SFX B o       ebarve          io        
SFX B o       ebarue          io          
SFX B o       ebaris          io        
SFX B o       ebarisque       io        
SFX B o       ebarisqve       io        
SFX B o       ebarisne        io        
SFX B o       ebarisve        io        
SFX B o       ebarisue        io          
SFX B o       ebare           io        
SFX B o       ebareque        io        
SFX B o       ebareqve        io        
SFX B o       ebarene         io        
SFX B o       ebareve         io        
SFX B o       ebareue         io          
SFX B o       ebatur          io        
SFX B o       ebatvr          io        
SFX B o       ebaturque       io        
SFX B o       ebatvrqve       io        
SFX B o       ebaturne        io        
SFX B o       ebatvrne        io        
SFX B o       ebaturve        io        
SFX B o       ebaturue        io          
SFX B o       ebatvrve        io        
SFX B o       ebamur          io        
SFX B o       ebamvr          io        
SFX B o       ebamurque       io        
SFX B o       ebamvrqve       io        
SFX B o       ebamurne        io        
SFX B o       ebamvrne        io        
SFX B o       ebamurve        io        
SFX B o       ebamurue        io          
SFX B o       ebamvrve        io        
SFX B o       ebamini         io        
SFX B o       ebaminique      io        
SFX B o       ebaminiqve      io        
SFX B o       ebaminine       io        
SFX B o       ebaminive       io        
SFX B o       ebaminiue       io          
SFX B o       ebantur         io        
SFX B o       ebantvr         io        
SFX B o       ebanturque      io        
SFX B o       ebantvrqve      io        
SFX B o       ebanturne       io        
SFX B o       ebantvrne       io        
SFX B o       ebanturve       io        
SFX B o       ebanturue       io          
SFX B o       ebantvrve       io        
SFX B o       ar              io        
SFX B o       arque           io        
SFX B o       arqve           io        
SFX B o       arne            io        
SFX B o       arve            io        
SFX B o       arue            io          
SFX B o       eris            io        
SFX B o       erisque         io        
SFX B o       erisqve         io        
SFX B o       erisne          io        
SFX B o       erisve          io        
